District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.108

Foreign corporations — Service of process; Mayor as agent.

Repealed.

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 223, ch. 269, § 108
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 571, Pub. L. 85-254, § 25
July 23, 1959, 73 Stat. 242, Pub. L. 86-106, § 15
Sept. 3, 1963, 77 Stat. 138, Pub. L. 88-111, § 1(8)
Mar. 14, 1984, D.C. Law 5-64, § 2(c), 31 DCR 195
Sept. 10, 1992, D.C. Law 9-144, § 4(rr), 39 DCR 4863
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720
2001 Ed., § 29-101.108.
1981 Ed., § 29-399.9.
1973 Ed., § 29-933i.